Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.460

Application of RCW 41.06.450 and 41.06.455 to classified and exempt employees.

Notwithstanding RCW 41.06.040, 41.06.450 and 41.06.455 apply to all classified and exempt employees of the state, including employees of the institutions of higher education.

[ 1982 c 208 s 12.]

NOTES: